Alabama, session 2026rs, SB133.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
26 Section 1. Sections 45-32-150, 45-32-150.01,
27 45-32-150.02, 45-32-150.06, 45-32-150.07, 45-32-150.08,
28 45-32-150.11, 45-32-150.12, 45-32-150.13, 45-32-150.16, and
Page 1

45-32-150.11, 45-32-150.12, 45-32-150.13, 45-32-150.16, and
SB133 Engrossed
29 45-32-150.20, Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as
30 follows:
31 "§45-32-150
32 (a) The Greene County Racing Commission is hereby
33 created and established and is vested with the powers and
34 duties specified in this part, and all other powers necessary
35 and proper to enable it to execute fully and effectually the
36 purposes of this part. The official name of the commission
37 shall be Greene County Racing Commission, the same being
38 sometimes referred to herein as the racing commission or the
39 commission.
40 (b) The commission shall consist of three persons who
41 shall be appointed by the Governor legislative delegation that
42 represents Greene County in the House and the Senate for the
43 State of Alabama. Each such member shall hold office for a
44 term of eightthree years from the effective date of the
45 appointment; provided, however, the term of office of the
46 present three commissioners shall expire three years after
47 their last appointment.
48 (c) If a vacancy occurs for any reason, then that
49 position shall be filled for the unexpired term and that
50 commissioner shall be chosen in the same manner as other
51 commissioners are appointed.
52 (d) All books, records, maps, documents, and papers
53 shall constitute public records, and shall be available for
54 copying, examination, and inspection during all normal
55 business hours by any agency, official, or personnel."
56 "§45-32-150.01
Page 2

"§45-32-150.01
SB133 Engrossed
57 (a) The members of the commission shall be qualified
58 electors of Greene County and not less than 21 years of age,
59 who shall have resided in the State of Alabama for a period of
60 not less than five years next preceding their appointment.
61 Each commissioner shall take the same constitutional oath of
62 office as other county officers, and shall give bond payable
63 to the county in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000),
64 conditioned that he or she shall faithfully and properly
65 perform the duties of his or her office. The premiums on
66 suchthe bonds shall be paid by the commission. The commission
67 may employ such assistanceas many assistants and employees as
68 may be necessary who shall be paid out of funds deposited in
69 the county treasury to the credit of the racing commission.
70 (b) A member of the racing commission may not be an
71 official member of any board of directors, or person
72 financially interested in any race track, pari-mutuel license,
73 or race meeting licensed by the commission, nor shall he or
74 she race dogs in any race meeting licensed by the commission.
75 (c) The members, officers, executive director,
76 employees, and representatives of the commission shall be
77 immune from suit and liability, both personally and in their
78 official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of
79 property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by
80 or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
81 omission that occurred, or that the individual for whom the
82 claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred
83 within the scope of the commission employment, duties, or
84 responsibilities. Nothing in this subjection shall be
Page 3

responsibilities. Nothing in this subjection shall be
SB133 Engrossed
85 construed to protect any individual from suit or liability for
86 damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional,
87 willful, or wanton misconduct of that individual. The
88 procurement of insurance of any type by the board does not in
89 any way compromise or limit the immunity granted by this
90 subsection."
91 "§45-32-150.02
92 (a) The qualifications and manner of appointment of
93 members of the Greene County Racing Commission shall be set by
94 local law. The salary or other compensation of a member of the
95 Greene County Racing Commission shall be set by the local
96 legislative delegation that represents Greene County in the
97 state Legislature.The compensation of each member of the
98 commission shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000)
99 annually. Each commissioner who attends a racing event or
100 performs the duties required by this part, at the facility,
101 shall receive an additional fifty dollars ($50) per day.
102 (b) One member of the commission shall be in attendance
103 or on call to cover each 24-hour pari-mutuel dayrequired to be
104 in attendance at each racing event.
105 (c) Each member of the Greene County Racing Commission
106 shall be paid at the same rate as any other employee of the
107 Greene County Commission for attending any out-of-town meeting
108 on official business of the Greene County Racing Commission.
109 (d) The above compensation and other sums required to
110 be paid under this section shall be paid out of the funds in
111 the county treasury deposited to the credit ofcollected by the
112 Greene County Racing Commission and shall be paid to the
Page 4

Greene County Racing Commission and shall be paid to the
SB133 Engrossed
113 commissioners in the same manner as the compensation of other
114 county officers is paid."
115 "§45-32-150.06
116 Any person, association, or corporation desiring to
117 operate a racetrack or pari-mutuel license in the county,
118 shall have the right, subject to this part, to hold and
119 conduct one or more racing meetings at the track each year,
120 provided that no such license shall be granted to any person,
121 association, or corporation, or to any track, for a period
122 including more than 313 racing days in any one year. The
123 racing days shall include the charity days as provided in
124 Section 45-32-150.21 for the racetrack."
125 "§45-32-150.07
126 No race or racing shall be permitted on Sunday. No
127 person individual under 18 years of age shall may be employed
128 in any manner about the race track or pari-mutuel license
129 except as exercise boys and grooms; nor shall persons under 18
130 years of age or be permitted to attend any race."
131 "§45-32-150.08
132 (a) On or before the first day of December of each
133 year, anyAny person, association, or corporation possessing
134 the qualifications prescribed in this part shall have the
135 right to apply to the racing commission for a permit or
136 license to conduct race meetings and racing under this part.
137 (b) On or before the first day of January of each
138 year,Within 30 days after the receipt of any such application
139 under this section, the commission shall convene to consider
140 and act upon all permits or licenses applied for which an
Page 5

and act upon all permits or licenses applied for which an
SB133 Engrossed
141 application has been received.
142 (c) Approved permits or licenses shall be granted for a
143 period of not more than 10 years from the date of issuance and
144 shall set forth, in addition to any other information
145 prescribed by the commission, the name of the licensee, the
146 location of the race track or pari-mutuel license, duration of
147 the race meeting, and the kind of racing desired to be
148 conducted and shall show the receipt by the commission of a
149 license fee set by the commission, the setting of which is
150 hereby authorized, provided, however, the license fee shall
151 not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) annually.
152 (d) The fee for the license shall be established by the
153 commission. The annual license fee may not exceed twenty-five
154 thousand dollars ($25,000) or, for multi-year contracts, not
155 more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each year
156 of the multi-year contract.
157 (e) No such license issued under this section shall be
158 transferable, nor shall it apply to any other place, track, or
159 enclosure, except the one specified in this licensewith the
160 approval of the commission.
161 (1)(f) The commission shall not issue any licenses
162 which would permit any two race tracks in the county to
163 operate on the same racing days. Further, after the first
164 license has been issued to the licensee, all subsequent
165 applications for The commission may issue no more than two
166 racetrack or pari-mutuel licenses.
167 (g) When applying to renew a license, by a permit
168 holderthe application shall be accompanied by proof, in such a
Page 6

holderthe application shall be accompanied by proof, in such a
SB133 Engrossed
169 form as the commission may require, that the licensee still
170 possesses the qualifications set out in this part. Such The
171 application for renewal of licenses a license shall be granted
172 upon the same terms and conditions as previously issued and
173 shall not be denied except for due cause.
174 (h) An application for a license to operate a racetrack
175 or pari-mutuel pool shall only be granted if the applicant
176 meets the following:
177 (1) The applicant is a corporation, association,
178 company, partnership, sole proprietorship, individual, or
179 other legal entity that has been incorporated, organized, or
180 otherwise established in this state and currently holds a
181 racetrack or pari-mutuel license immediately preceding the
182 date on which the license is issued.
183 (2) If the applicant is a corporation, association,
184 company, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other legal
185 entity, the applicant has been incorporated, organized, or
186 otherwise established in this state for at least five years
187 and its managing member or majority officer has been a
188 resident of this state for at least five years immediately
189 preceding the date on which the license is issued.
190 (3) If the applicant is an individual, the applicant
191 has been a resident of this state for at least five years
192 immediately preceding the date on which the license is issued.
193 (2)(i) Seventy-fiveTo the best of a licensee's ability,
194 75 percent of the employees of the track or tracks shall be
195 bona fide resident citizens of Greene County, Alabama."
196 "§45-32-150.11
Page 7

"§45-32-150.11
SB133 Engrossed
197 (a) The commission shall have the power to grant,
198 refuse, suspend, or withdraw licenses to all persons connected
199 with race tracks, including gate keepers, announcers, ushers,
200 starters, officials, drivers, dog owners, agents, trainers,
201 grooms, stable foremen, exercise boys, veterinarians, valets,
202 sellers of racing forms or bulletins, and attendants in
203 connection with the wagering machines, pursuant to such the
204 rules and regulations as adopted by the commission may adopt
205 and upon the payment of a license fee as fixed and determined
206 by the commission in accordance with the position and
207 compensation of such person.
208 (b) Any license may be revoked by the commission, at
209 its discretion, and any person whose license is revoked shall
210 be ineligible to participate in such occupation connected with
211 racing unless the license is returned by the commission with
212 permission to operate thereunder. The commission may deny or
213 revoke a license to any person who has been refused or denied
214 a license by any other state racing commission or racing
215 authority.
216 (c) Upon a licensee's willful violation of this part or
217 any rule of the commission, the commission may do either of
218 the following:
219 (1) Suspend or revoke the license of the licensee.
220 (2) Assess a fine against the licensee of not more than
221 one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense."
222 "§45-32-150.12
223 (a) The commission shall make rules governing,
224 permitting, and regulating the wagering on dog races under the
Page 8

permitting, and regulating the wagering on dog races under the
SB133 Engrossed
225 form of mutuel wagering by patrons known as pari-mutuel
226 wagering, which method shall be legal to the extent that and
227 so long as, the same is carried on and conducted strictly in
228 conformity with this part, and not otherwise. Only the
229 persons, associations, or corporations receiving a license
230 from the commission shall have the right or privilege to
231 conduct this type of wagering and the licenses shall restrict
232 and confine this form of wagering to a space within the race
233 meeting grounds. All other forms of wagering on the result of
234 dog races shall continue to be illegal, and any or all
235 wagering outside of the enclosure of such races, where such
236 races shall have been licensed by the commission shall be
237 illegal.
238 (b) No person or corporation shall directly or
239 indirectly purchase pari-mutuel tickets or participate in the
240 purchase of any part of a pari-mutuel pool for another for
241 hire or for any gratuity and no person shall purchase any part
242 of a pari-mutuel pool through another, wherein he or she gives
243 or pays directly or indirectly such other person anything of
244 value. Any person violating this section shall be deemed
245 guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction in a court of
246 competent jurisdiction, shall be punished by a fine of not
247 more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment not
248 to exceed six months, or both fine and imprisonment in the
249 discretion of the court.
250 (c) In addition to other rules and regulations that may
251 be promulgatedadopted by the racing commission, the following
252 shall be complied with by the licensee or operator of the race
Page 9

shall be complied with by the licensee or operator of the race
SB133 Engrossed
253 plant and employees thereof.:
254 (1) A duly licensed veterinarian shall be on the
255 grounds at weighing time and make examination of the physical
256 condition of each greyhound, and any dog not considered to be
257 in good physical condition, shall be reported to the presiding
258 official.
259 (2)(1) An adequate security force shall be employed as
260 prescribed by the racing commission. Members of security force
261 shall have the same powers as other law enforcement officers
262 of the county while performing their duties on the premises of
263 the racetrack.
264 (3)(2) Public liability insurance shall be carried by
265 the licensee or operator in an amount and with a company
266 approved by the racing commission.
267 (4)(3) A pari-mutuel ticket shall not be sold to an
268 individual who is visibly inebriated.
269 (5) The racing operator is authorized to open the
270 Greene County Racetrack for business and to conduct live
271 greyhound racing and or televised horse or greyhound racing
272 and pari-mutuel wagering during the hours as it deems
273 desirable, however in no event shall the racing commission be
274 authorized to allow live greyhound racing or televised horse
275 or greyhound racing, or both, and pari-mutuel wagering thereon
276 to be conducted after 2:00 AM on Sunday; provided that the
277 racing operator shall not conduct any live racing event at the
278 Greene County Racetrack before 10:00 AM, nor shall it present
279 any televised racing event before 8:00 AM with the hour to be
280 determined according to the time then applicable in Alabama.
Page 10

determined according to the time then applicable in Alabama.
SB133 Engrossed
281 If the racing operator keeps the Greene County Racetrack open
282 for business until midnight on any day, whether conducting
283 pari-mutuel wagering on live racing or televised racing, or
284 both, the racing operator may continue all or any of its
285 operations past midnight for not exceeding the first two hours
286 of the following day, even if the following day is not a day
287 on which the Greene County Racetrack is scheduled to be open
288 for business as a racing day permitted under this part, and
289 the time, not exceeding two hours, for which the operations of
290 the racetrack are continued into the following day shall not
291 be counted as a racing day or any part thereof against the
292 limit of racing days permitted the racing operator in any one
293 year. A pari-mutuel ticket shall not be sold to an individual
294 who is visibly inebriated.
295 (6)(4) Notwithstanding the provisions of this part and
296 any rules and regulations of the racing commission now in
297 effect, there shall be no limit imposed upon the number of
298 races which may be conducted within a single racing program."
299 "§45-32-150.13
300 (a) Every licensee conducting race meetings under this
301 part, shall pay to the ex-officio treasurer of the racing
302 commission, for the use of the commission, a tax in an amount
303 equal to four percent of the total contributions to all
304 simulcast pari-mutuel pools conducted or made on any race
305 track or pari-mutuel licenseelicensed under this part. The
306 commission of a licensee on a pari-mutuel pool shall in no
307 event exceed 18 percent of the amount contributed to the
308 pari-mutuel pool, which amount shall include the four percent
Page 11

pari-mutuel pool, which amount shall include the four percent
SB133 Engrossed
309 tax heretofore provided. After the deduction of the four
310 percent for the use of the commission and the percentage
311 commission of the licensee, the remainder of the total
312 contributions to each pool shall be divided among and
313 redistributed to the contributors to such pools betting on the
314 winning dog. The amount of each redistribution for each
315 winning bet placed shall be determined by dividing the total
316 amount remaining in the pool after the deductions hereinabove
317 provided for by the number of bets placed on the winning dog.
318 Each redistribution shall be made in a sum equal to the next
319 lowest multiple of 10. The licensee is entitled to retain the
320 odd cents of all redistributions to be known as the breaks to
321 the dime, and all monies represented by any unclaimed,
322 uncashed, or abandoned pari-mutuel tickets known as outs
323 money. Under the pari-mutuel system of wagering herein
324 provided, the licensee shall be permitted to provide separate
325 pools for bets to win, place, and show and also a daily double
326 pool, a quiniela pool, double quiniela pool, trifecta pool,
327 and such other bets and pools as the commission may from time
328 to time allow. Each pool shall be redistributed separately as
329 herein provided. Should there be no ticket bet on the winning
330 dog, the entire pool shall be divided among the holders of
331 tickets on the dog running next in line until the pool has
332 been redistributed to the contributors. The licensee shall be
333 required to use a totalizator machine to record the wagering
334 and compute the odds. Rules and regulations governing the
335 operation of each of the pools shall be set out in book form
336 by the racing commission. The licensee shall collect from each
Page 12

by the racing commission. The licensee shall collect from each
SB133 Engrossed
337 person attending the race meeting under this part 15 percent
338 of the established admissions price or ten cents ($.10),
339 whichever sum is greater, as an admission tax. Licensees shall
340 make payment of such taxes to the ex-officio treasurer of the
341 racing commission every tenth calendar day of any and every
342 race meeting, which payment shall be accompanied by a report
343 on the races covered by such report and such other information
344 as the commission may require. Every license issued by the
345 commission shall contain the terms, conditions, provisions,
346 percentage commissions of licensee, and tax as set forth in
347 this section, which such terms, conditions, provisions,
348 percentage commission of licensee, and tax shall not be
349 altered or changed during the term of such license without the
350 mutual consent of the commission and licensee.
351 (b) Every licensee conducting historical horse racing
352 under this part shall pay to the ex-officio treasurer of the
353 racing commission, for the use of the commission, a tax in an
354 amount equal to 10 percent of the total contributions less
355 prizes and promotions paid to winners from all historical
356 horse racing pari-mutuel pools conducted or made on any
357 racetrack or pari-mutuel licensee under this part. The tax may
358 be adjusted as determined necessary by the commission but
359 shall not exceed 15 percent."
360 "§45-32-150.16
361 (a) All fees, commissions, taxes, and other monies,
362 including fines and forfeitures, received under this part
363 shall be paid to the Treasurer of Greene County and deposited
364 by the treasurer in the county treasury to the account of
Page 13

by the treasurer in the county treasury to the account of
SB133 Engrossed
365 theex-officio Treasurer of the Greene County Racing Commission
366 and distributed by and through the Greene County Racing
367 Commission. All such monies remaining, after payment of
368 expenses incurred and retention of necessary operational
369 funding in the administration of this part, including the
370 payment of the salaries and expenses of the members and
371 employees of this commission, shallmay be distributed on a
372 quarterly basis as follows:
373 (1) There shall be distributed toTo the Greene County
374 Commission, an amount not to exceed two hundred thousand
375 dollars ($200,000)forty thousand dollars ($40,000) per year:
376 a. To pay principal of and interest on bonds, warrants,
377 or other securities at any time thereafter issued by the
378 Greene County Commission for the purpose of providing and
379 equipping the existing jail facility; or constructing new jail
380 facilities and renovating, improving, and equipping existing
381 jail facilities.
382 b. To enable the county to make lease rental payments
383 to any public corporation in an amount sufficient to retire
384 bonds or other securities issued by such public corporation
385 for the purpose of providing funds to pay cost of acquiring,
386 providing, construction, and equipping a new jail facility;
387 renovating, improving, and equipping the existing jail
388 facility; or constructing new jail facilities and renovating
389 existing jail facilities, or any combination thereof.
390 c. To pay principal of and any interest on bonds,
391 warrants, or other securities at any time hereafter issued by
392 the Greene County Commission for the purpose of providing
Page 14

the Greene County Commission for the purpose of providing
SB133 Engrossed
393 funds to pay costs of acquiring, providing, constructing, and
394 equipping a new county courthouse; and renovating, improving,
395 and equipping the existing county courthouse.
396 d. To enable the county to make lease rental payments
397 to any public corporation in an amount sufficient to retire
398 bonds or other securities issued by such public corporation
399 for the purpose of providing funds to pay costs of acquiring,
400 providing, construction, and equipping a new county
401 courthouse; renovating, improving, and equipping the existing
402 county courthouse; or acquiring, providing, constructing, and
403 equipping a new county courthouse and renovating, improving,
404 and equipping the existing county courthouse or any
405 combination thereof. At such time as the principal and
406 interest bonds, warrants, or other securities heretofore
407 mentioned are satisfied, then the sum shall be prorated
408 equally as provided in the following subdivisions (2), (3),
409 (4), and (5).
410 The balance is to be distributed as follows:
411 (2) Twenty-five percent of the monies shall be
412 appropriated to the municipalities of Greene County on a per
413 capita basis according to the most recent population figures
414 used by the federal government for the purpose of revenue
415 sharing, or if these figures are not available, the most
416 recent federal decennial census shall be used.
417 (3) Five Seven percent to the Greene County Hospital
418 Board.
419 (4) Thirty percent of the monies shall be appropriated
420 to the Greene County Board of Education.
Page 15

to the Greene County Board of Education.
SB133 Engrossed
421 (5) One percent to the E-911 system.
422 (6) Two percent to the Greene County Industrial
423 Development Authority to be used first for the development and
424 provision of natural gas to the Crossroads of America
425 Industrial Park.
426 (7) One percent for the maintenance or provision of a
427 county ambulance service.
428 (5)(8) FortyThirty-four percent of the monies shall be
429 appropriated to the General Fund of Greene County to be
430 allocated and spent in the following prescribed manner:
431 a. Fifty-five and one-halfForty percent of this amount
432 shall remain unearmarked and may be spent by the county
433 commission in any manner, provided by law, for the benefit of
434 the citizens of Greene County, by the county governing body
435 thereof.
436 b. Ten percent to be used by the county governing
437 bodycommission to upgradefor law enforcement purposes in the
438 county.
439 c. Fifteen percent for the Greene County fire
440 departments.
441 c. Eight percent for the maintenance of a county
442 ambulance service.
443 d. TwoFour percent for the establishment and
444 maintenance of day care centers within the county.
445 e. Three Four and one-half percent to be appropriated
446 to the Greene County Library Association for the upgrading of
447 the library system.
448 f. One Two percent to be appropriated to the Community
Page 16

f. One Two percent to be appropriated to the Community
SB133 Engrossed
449 Services Programs of Tuscaloosa-Bibb Counties, Incorporated,
450 to be used for assistance to low income residents of Greene
451 County.
452 g. Two percent to be appropriated to the West Alabama
453 Mental Health Center, Incorporated, to be used for mental
454 health services within Greene County.
455 h. One Three percent to be appropriated to the Greene
456 County Retired Senior Volunteer Program (RSVP)Woman to Woman,
457 Incorporated.
458 i. Two Three and one-half percent to be appropriated to
459 the Society of Folk Arts and Culture, Incorporated, for
460 culture and youth development.
461 j. One percent to be appropriated to the Greene County
462 Commission to be used as follows:
463 1. One-third of the one percent thereof to be used by
464 the county commission in cultural and historical preservation.
465 2. One-third of the onej. One percent thereof to the
466 Greene County Historical Society for their use in restoring
467 and preserving historic sites and buildings in the county.
468 3. One-third of the onek. One percent thereof to the
469 Alabama Civil Rights Educational Freedom Museum, Incorporated.
470 k. Two l. Three percent to the Greene County Health
471 Department to be used for general health care in Greene County
472 and to augment the Women, Infants, and Children (WIC) and
473 related health programs in Greene County.
474 l. Three m. Four percent to be appropriated to the
475 Parks and Recreation Board. No more than 15 percent of the
476 three percent thereof shall be used for maintenance and
Page 17

three percent thereof shall be used for maintenance and
SB133 Engrossed
477 development of the Greene County Golf Course.
478 m.n. Four and one-half percent to Greene County
479 Community Improvement Association for the construction,
480 renovation, and operation of community centers in Tishabee,
481 Clinton, Dollarhide, Knoxville, Mantua, and Mt. Hebron. When
482 the foregoing facilities have been constructed and renovated
483 in these communities, then the funds shall be designated for
484 the general use and operations of the Greene County Community
485 Improvement Association for the construction of additional
486 community centers and the operation of community centers in
487 Greene County.
488 n.o. One and three-quarters percent to be appropriated
489 to Branch Heights.
490 o.p. Three-quarters percent to be appropriated to the
491 county department of human resources.
492 p. One and one-half percent to be appropriated to the
493 E-911 system.
494 (b) The Greene County Racing Commission shall
495 redistribute the allocated funding of any defunct agency or
496 organization receiving funds under this section."
497 "§45-32-150.20
498 (a) It shall be unlawful for any person to transmit or
499 communicate to another by any means whatsoever the results,
500 changing odds, track conditions, or any other information
501 relating to any greyhound race from any race track in this
502 county, between the period of time beginning one hour prior to
503 the first race of the day and ending 30 minutes after the
504 posting of the official results of each race, as to that
Page 18

posting of the official results of each race, as to that
SB133 Engrossed
505 particular race, except that this period may be reduced to
506 permit the transmitting of the results of the last race each
507 day not sooner than 15 minutes after the official posting of
508 such results. Provided, however, that the commission may, by
509 rule, permit the immediate transmission by radio, television,
510 or press wire of any pertinent information concerning feature
511 races.
512 (b)(a) It shall be unlawful for any person to transmit
513 by any means whatsoever racing information to any other
514 person, or to relay the same to any other person by word of
515 mouth, by signal, or by use of telephone, telegraph, radio, or
516 any other means, when the information is knowingly used or
517 intended to be used for illegal gambling purposes, or in
518 furtherance of such gambling purposes.
519 (b) No license shall be issued which would allow any
520 race track or pari-mutuel licensee in the county to operate on
521 the same day.
522 (c) Any person violating this section shall be guilty
523 of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be imprisoned in the
524 state penitentiary for not less than one year nor more than 10
525 years, or shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars
526 ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or
527 both, in the discretion of the court."
528 Section 2. (a) The Legislature hereby finds and
529 declares that a computerized machine, which replays actual
530 historical horse races and allows pari-mutuel wagering
531 thereon, is already a permissible lawful activity at each of
532 the four pari-mutuel wagering racetracks in the State of
Page 19

the four pari-mutuel wagering racetracks in the State of
SB133 Engrossed
533 Alabama. The Legislature hereby further finds and declares
534 that a uniform local tax on the handle from pari-mutuel
535 wagering on these historical horse racing computerized
536 machines is necessary for the licensed racetrack and
537 pari-mutuel licenses located in Greene County so that such
538 racetrack and pari-mutuel licenses can be competitive with the
539 other racetracks and pari-mutuel licenses located in the State
540 of Alabama.
541 (b) For purposes of this act, pari-mutuel wagering on
542 historical horse racing computerized machines may be conducted
543 without regard to any of the following: (i) The type of
544 graphics on the machine used to conduct the activity; (ii)
545 whether the patron chooses a specific horse upon which to
546 wager; and (iii) whether the patron watches all or part of the
547 historical race.
548 (c) The local tax on pari-mutuel wagering on historical
549 horse races on these computerized machines at the Greene
550 County racetrack and other pari-mutuel licenses shall be
551 calculated at a rate up to 15 percent and the state tax rate
552 shall be levied at one percent and shall be collected,
553 administered, and distributed in the same manner and on the
554 same terms as are applicable to the local pari-mutuel tax on
555 live greyhound racing conducted at the Greene County racetrack
556 and pari-mutuel licenses, provided that the total handle less
557 prizes paid to winners from pari-mutuel wagering of historical
558 horse races on these computerized machines shall be separately
559 calculated from any other racing handle, live or simulcast.
560 (d) It is the intent of the Legislature in assessing a
Page 20

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature in assessing a
SB133 Engrossed
561 state and local tax that the tax shall be in lieu of any other
562 tax on pari-mutuel wagering on historical horse races on these
563 computerized machines that may otherwise be imposed by law,
564 including, but not limited to, any tax assessed pursuant to
565 Sections 45-32-151.02, 40-23-2, 40-23-61, and 40-12-222, Code
566 of Alabama 1975.
567 Section 3. The following sections are repealed:
568 (1) Section 45-32-150.09, Code of Alabama 1975,
569 relating to the suspension or revocation of licenses.
570 (2) Section 45-32-150.19, Code of Alabama 1975,
571 relating to the manipulation of race outcomes.
572 Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 21

Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately.
SB133 Engrossed
573
574
575 Senate
576 Read for the first time and referred ................13-Jan-26
577 to the Senate committee on Local
578 Legislation
579
580 Read for the second time and placed ................19-Feb-26
581 on the calendar:
582 1 amendment
583
584 Read for the third time and passed ................25-Feb-26
585 as amended
586 Yeas 18
587 Nays 2
588 Abstains 1
589
590
591 Patrick Harris,
592 Secretary.
593
Page 22